Louisiana, session 2026, HB804.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 18 of Subtitle I of Title 30 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 30:1601 through 1605, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 18. LOUISIANA ENERGY PROTECTION ACT
§1601. Title
This Chapter shall be known as the "Louisiana Energy Protection Act".
§1602. Public policy
A. The legislature hereby declares that it is the public policy of the state of
Louisiana to promote and support the production and consumption of energy to meet
the energy needs of this state, the nation, and the world. Further, it is the public
policy of the state of Louisiana to protect energy users, producers, and related
industries from claims that greenhouse gas emissions caused or contributed to
climate change that directly or indirectly resulted in damages to others including but
not limited to personal injury, death, property damages, or economic loss.
B. The legislature recognizes that any covered civil liability action for
climate change damages from greenhouse gas emissions is preempted by federal law,
including the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., and intends, notwithstanding
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 804 ENROLLED
any other provision of law to the contrary, for this Chapter to limit all rights of
action, causes of actions, or claims constituting a covered civil liability action for
climate change damages from greenhouse gas emissions under Louisiana state law
or in Louisiana state courts as provided in this Chapter.
§1603. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms shall have the following
meanings ascribed to them in this Section unless context or use clearly indicates
otherwise:
(1) "Climate change" means any actual or alleged change in global or
regional climate conditions, weather patterns, temperature, sea levels, storm
frequency or severity, or atmospheric composition, whether characterized as caused
by human activity, natural forces, or both. For purposes of this Chapter, climate
change shall include a change of climate which is attributed directly or indirectly to
activity that alters the composition of the atmosphere, including the emission of
greenhouse gases.
(2) "Covered civil liability action for climate change damages from
greenhouse gas emissions" means any claim or action for damages, penalties, or any
other form of relief whether legal or equitable or otherwise, or any cause of action
for fraud, misrepresentation, deception, or failure to warn, whether brought under
statute or under the Louisiana Civil Code or any other source of Louisiana law, that
purports to arise out of or relate to, or seek relief of any kind arising out of or relating
to, climate change or the alleged effects of climate change from greenhouse gas
emissions or any debate, public controversy, or discussion arising out of or relating
to climate change, its causes, or the alleged effects of climate change from
greenhouse gas emissions.
(3) "Greenhouse gases" means those gaseous constituents of the atmosphere,
both natural and anthropogenic, that absorb and emit infrared radiation including but
not limited to carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, water vapor, ozone, or
fluorinated gases, such as chlorofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, sulfur
hexafluoride, and nitrogen trifluoride.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 804 ENROLLED
(4) "Person" means any individual or legal entity, public or private, including
nonprofit, nongovernmental, and governmental entities.
§1604. Actions; prohibited
A. No covered civil liability action for climate change damages from
greenhouse gas emissions, as defined in R.S. 30:1603, shall be brought, filed, or
maintained by any person against any person in any court or proceeding in this state,
including any claim, cause of action, or judicial or administrative proceeding. This
prohibition shall not apply to claims, actions, or judicial or administrative
proceedings brought for unlawful acts arising out of either of the following:
(1) A violation of an enforceable Louisiana or federal statutory limitation or
restriction against emissions of greenhouse gas, or a violation of the express terms
of a valid, enforceable operating, air, or other permit issued by a Louisiana or federal
regulatory agency that has jurisdiction over greenhouse gas emissions.
(2) A violation of an enforceable standard expressly established under the
federal Occupational Safety and Health Act, 29 U.S.C. 651 et seq., where such
violation directly and proximately causes the specific injury alleged.
B. The provisions of this Chapter shall apply to all covered civil liability
actions for climate change damages from greenhouse gas emissions filed on or after
the effective date of this Chapter, regardless of when the conduct giving rise to such
action occurred.
§1605. Construction
No provision of this Chapter shall be construed to create a public or private
claim, cause of action, or remedy.
Section 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of
this Act shall not apply to any lawsuit for damages filed on or before the effective date of
this Act. The provisions of this Act shall not apply to any claims, lawsuits, or administrative
enforcement actions filed under, or pursuant to, the provisions of the State and Local Coastal
Resources Management Act of 1978, La. R.S. 49:214.21 et seq., or any regulations or
ordinances adopted or issued pursuant thereto, provided that no such claims, lawsuits, or
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 804 ENROLLED
administrative enforcement actions include allegations that defendants have caused,
contributed to, or otherwise are responsible for climate change as defined in this Act.
Section 3. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature of the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.